Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-801.01
Judicial nominating commission; members; oath.

All voting members of each nominating commission, before they enter upon their official duties, shall take the following oath or affirmation: "I do solemnly swear (or affirm) that I will faithfully discharge my duties as a member of the Judicial Nominating Commission for the ........ Court, that I will neither accept nor receive, directly or indirectly, any money or other valuable thing or any promise of office or assistance from any corporation, company, or person, for any vote or influence I may give or withhold in connection with the nomination of any person to a judicial vacancy; that I will, as necessary or expedient, encourage qualified candidates to accept judicial office or nomination for such judicial office, and that I will vote to nominate to judicial vacancies only candidates I believe are sufficiently qualified for judicial office". Such oath shall be administered by the Supreme Court Judge serving as chairperson of the judicial nominating commission to which the oath-taker is appointed.

Laws 1980, LB 730, § 2.